Washington statutes.
RCW 39.80.050

Procurement of architectural and engineering services—Contract negotiations.

(1) The agency shall negotiate a contract with the most qualified firm for architectural and engineering services at a price which the agency determines is fair and reasonable to the agency. In making its determination, the agency shall take into account the estimated value of the services to be rendered as well as the scope, complexity, and professional nature thereof.

(2) If the agency is unable to negotiate a satisfactory contract with the firm selected at a price the agency determines to be fair and reasonable, negotiations with that firm shall be formally terminated and the agency shall select other firms in accordance with RCW 39.80.040 and continue in accordance with this section until an agreement is reached or the process is terminated.

[ 1981 c 61 s 5.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1981 c 61: See note following RCW 39.80.010.